Hawaii statutes.
J. Partial
Public Financing

[§11-421] Hawaii election campaign
fund; creation. (a) The Hawaii election campaign fund is created as a
trust fund within the state treasury.

(b) The fund shall consist of:

(1) All moneys collected from persons who have
designated a portion of their income tax liability to the fund as provided in
section 235-102.5(a);

(2) Any general fund appropriations; and

(3) Other moneys collected pursuant to this part.

(c) Moneys in the fund shall be paid to
candidates by the comptroller as prescribed in section 11-431 and may be used
for the commission's operating expenses, including staff salaries and fringe
benefits. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next